apertium-cy-en.cy.dix.xml
    <pardef n="ailystyri/ed__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wn</l>
          <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wch</l>
          <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nt</l>
          <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="impers"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wn</l>
          <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ai</l>
          <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>m</l>
          <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ch</l>
          <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nt</l>
          <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>d</l>
          <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="impers"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ais</l>
          <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aist</l>
          <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>odd</l>
          <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>asom</l>
          <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>asoch</l>
          <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>asant</l>
          <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wyd</l>
          <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="impers"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aswn</l>
          <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>asit</l>
          <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>asai</l>
          <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>asem</l>
          <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>asech</l>
          <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>asent</l>
          <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>asid</l>
          <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="impers"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>af</l>
          <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wn</l>
          <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wch</l>
          <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ant</l>
          <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="impers"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wyf</l>
          <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ch</l>
          <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>och</l>
          <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ont</l>
          <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="impers"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ailystyried"><i>ailystyri</i><par n="ailystyri/ed__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="brysgerdded"><par n="initial-b"/><i>rysgerdd</i><par n="ailystyri/ed__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cerdded"><par n="initial-c"/><i>erdd</i><par n="ailystyri/ed__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cydgerdded"><par n="initial-c"/><i>ydgerdd</i><par n="ailystyri/ed__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="diystyried"><par n="initial-d"/><i>iystyri</i><par n="ailystyri/ed__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="erglywed"><i>erglyw</i><par n="ailystyri/ed__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="gweitied"><par n="initial-g"/><i>weiti</i><par n="ailystyri/ed__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rhagdybied"><par n="initial-rh"/><i>agdybi</i><par n="ailystyri/ed__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="synied"><i>syni</i><par n="ailystyri/ed__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tybied"><par n="initial-t"/><i>ybi</i><par n="ailystyri/ed__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ymglywed"><i>ymglyw</i><par n="ailystyri/ed__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ystyried"><i>ystyri</i><par n="ailystyri/ed__vblex"/></e>
